District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1006

Repealed

Articles of organization.

Repealed.

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 7, 41 DCR 3010
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-38, § 2(c), 42 DCR 3269
June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-133, § 2(b), 47 DCR 2686
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 29-1306.
2001 Ed., § 29-1006.